Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-121.01
Voice over Internet protocol service, defined.

Voice over Internet protocol service means an interconnected voice over Internet protocol service as defined in 47 C.F.R. part 9, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2019.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 20.